Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1463.02
Late filing fees and civil penalties; interest.

Interest shall accrue on all late filing fees and civil penalties imposed under the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act at the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted. The interest shall begin to accrue thirty days after the commission sends notice to the person of the assessment of the late filing fee or civil penalty. A written request filed with the commission for relief from late filing fees shall stay the accrual of interest on a late filing fee until such time as the commission grants or denies the request. The commission may waive the payment of accrued interest in the amount of twenty-five dollars or less.

Laws 2000, LB 438, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB527, § 4.